Utah statutes.
77-29-8.   Interstate agreement -- Application of habitual criminal law.

Nothing in the agreement on detainers shall be construed to require the application of the habitual criminal law of this state to any person as a result of any conviction had in a proceeding brought to final disposition by reason of the use of said agreement.

